Washington statutes.
RCW 43.210.060

Rule-making authority.

The department of commerce or its statutory successor shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2074; 1995 c 399 s 108; 1985 c 466 s 65; 1983 1st ex.s. c 20 s 6.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.